Hawaii statutes.
[§658G-11]
Governmental entity as party. (a) The disqualification of
section 658G-9(a) applies to a collaborative lawyer representing a party that
is a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.

(b) After a collaborative law process
concludes, another lawyer in a law firm with which the collaborative lawyer is
associated may represent a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality in the collaborative matter or a matter related to the
collaborative matter if:

(1) The collaborative law participation agreement so
provides; and

(2) The collaborative lawyer is isolated from any
participation in the collaborative matter or a matter related to the
collaborative matter through procedures within the law firm which are
reasonably calculated to isolate the collaborative lawyer from that
participation. [L 2012, c 207, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next